Nebraska, session 109, LB379.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB379 LB379
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 68-1724, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-1724 (1) Cash assistance shall be provided for a period or
periods of time not to exceed a total of twenty-four sixty months for
recipient families with children subject to the following:
(a) If the state fails to meet the specific terms of the self-
sufficiency contract developed under section 68-1719, the twenty-four-
month sixty-month time limit established in this section shall be
extended;
(b) The twenty-four-month sixty-month time period for cash
assistance shall begin within the first month of eligibility;
(c) When no longer eligible to receive cash assistance, assistance
shall be available to reimburse work-related child care expenses even if
the recipient family has not achieved economic self-sufficiency. The
amount of such assistance shall be based on a cost-shared plan between
the recipient family and the state which shall provide assistance up to
two hundred percent of the federal poverty level prior to October 1,
2026, or one hundred eighty-five percent of the federal poverty level on
and after October 1, 2026. A recipient family may be required to
contribute up to twenty percent of such family's gross income for child
care. It is the intent of the Legislature that transitional health care
coverage be made available on a sliding-scale basis to individuals and
families with incomes up to one hundred eighty-five percent of the
federal poverty level if other health care coverage is not available; and
(d) The self-sufficiency contract shall be revised and cash
assistance extended when there is no job available for adult members of
the recipient family. It is the intent of the Legislature that available
job shall mean a job which results in an income of at least equal to the
amount of cash assistance that would have been available if receiving
assistance minus unearned income available to the recipient family.
The department shall develop policy guidelines to allow for cash
-2-

LB379 LB379
2025 2025
assistance to persons who have received the maximum cash assistance
provided by this section and who face extreme hardship without additional
assistance. For purposes of this section, extreme hardship means a
recipient family does not have adequate cash resources to meet the costs
of the basic needs of food, clothing, and housing without continuing
assistance or the child or children are at risk of losing care by and
residence with their parent or parents.
(2) Cash assistance conditions under the Welfare Reform Act shall be
as follows:
(a) Adults in recipient families shall mean individuals at least
nineteen years of age living with and related to a child eighteen years
of age or younger and shall include parents, siblings, uncles, aunts,
cousins, or grandparents, whether the relationship is biological,
adoptive, or step;
(b) The payment standard shall be based upon family size;
(c) The adults in the recipient family shall ensure that the minor
children regularly attend school. Education is a valuable personal
resource. The cash assistance provided to the recipient family may be
reduced when the parent or parents have failed to take reasonable action
to encourage the minor children of the recipient family ages sixteen and
under to regularly attend school. No reduction of assistance shall be
such as may result in extreme hardship. It is the intent of the
Legislature that a process be developed to insure communication between
the case manager, the parent or parents, and the school to address issues
relating to school attendance;
(d) Two-parent families which would otherwise be eligible under
section 43-504 or a federally approved waiver shall receive cash
assistance under this section;
(e) For minor parents, the assistance payment shall be based on the
minor parent's income. If the minor parent lives with at least one
parent, the family's income shall be considered in determining
-3-

LB379 LB379
2025 2025
eligibility and cash assistance payment levels for the minor parent. If
the minor parent lives independently, support shall be pursued from the
parents of the minor parent. If the absent parent of the minor's child is
a minor, support from his or her parents shall be pursued. Support from
parents as allowed under this subdivision shall not be pursued when the
family income is less than three hundred percent of the federal poverty
guidelines; and
(f) For adults who are not biological or adoptive parents or
stepparents of the child or children in the family, if assistance is
requested for the entire family, including the adults, a self-sufficiency
contract shall be entered into as provided in section 68-1719. If
assistance is requested for only the child or children in such a family,
such children shall be eligible after consideration of the family's
income and if (i) the family cooperates in pursuing child support and
(ii) the minor children of the family regularly attend school.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-1724, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-4-